apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="bask/s__n_m">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kareiv/is__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>im</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ī</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ju</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jiem</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jus</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jos</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jiem</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ji</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jiem</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ji</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dat/i__n_m">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oglek/lis__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ļa</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lim</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lī</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļa</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lis</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="po/lis__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ļa</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lim</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lī</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļa</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lis</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļu</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļiem</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļus</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļos</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļiem</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļi</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļiem</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļi</l><r>lis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mās/a__n_f">
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ās</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="anglis"><i>ang</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aprīlis"><i>aprī</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="apstāklis"><i>apstāk</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="auglis"><i>aug</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="austrumi"><i>austrum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="basks"><i>bask</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="brālis"><i>brā</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dati"><i>dat</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dienvidaustrumi"><i>dienvidaustrum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dienvidrietumi"><i>dienvidrietum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="divdīgļlapis"><i>divdīgļlap</i><par n="kareiv/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dziedātājs"><i>dziedātāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ērzelis"><i>ērze</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ēzelis"><i>ēze</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="franči"><i>franč</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ģenerālis"><i>ģenerā</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="itālis"><i>itā</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="karalis"><i>kara</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kareivis"><i>kareiv</i><par n="kareiv/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="katolis"><i>kato</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ķieģelis"><i>ķieģe</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="latgalis"><i>latga</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="līdzeklis"><i>līdzek</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lietotājs"><i>lietotāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="loceklis"><i>locek</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mācītājs"><i>mācītāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="māsa"><i>mās</i><par n="mās/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mazulis"><i>mazu</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="modelis"><i>mode</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mongolis"><i>mongo</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="muskulis"><i>musku</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zaglis"><i>zag</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zvirbulis"><i>zvirbu</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hospitālis"><i>hospitā</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dēlis"><i>dē</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spogulis"><i>spogu</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zīmulis"><i>zīmu</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="celis"><i>ce</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="garastāvoklis"><i>garastāvok</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hotelis"><i>hote</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dvielis"><i>dvie</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="profesionālis"><i>profesionā</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="burbulis"><i>burbu</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sēdeklis"><i>sēdek</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dzejolis"><i>dzejo</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ķeblis"><i>ķeb</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pūlis"><i>pū</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nodoklis"><i>nodok</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nokrišņi"><i>nokrišņ</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ogleklis"><i>oglek</i><par n="oglek/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pamats"><i>pamat</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pārstāvis"><i>pārstāv</i><par n="kareiv/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="piemineklis"><i>pieminek</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="polis"><i>po</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="portugālis"><i>portugā</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="puteklis"><i>putek</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rāpulis"><i>rāpu</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ražotājs"><i>ražotāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rietumi"><i>rietum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skābeklis"><i>skābek</i><par n="oglek/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skaitlis"><i>skait</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skolotājs"><i>skolotāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="slāpeklis"><i>slāpek</i><par n="oglek/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="solis"><i>so</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stāvoklis"><i>stāvok</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="svētki"><i>svētk</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tapīrs"><i>tapīr</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="templis"><i>temp</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tīmeklis"><i>tīmek</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uzvarētājs"><i>uzvarētāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vārti"><i>vārt</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vasalis"><i>vasa</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="viduslaiki"><i>viduslaik</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="viedoklis"><i>viedok</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zemgalis"><i>zemga</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zīdītājs"><i>zīdītāj</i><par n="bask/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ziemeļaustrumi"><i>ziemeļaustrum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ziemeļrietumi"><i>ziemeļrietum</i><par n="dat/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zobenbrālis"><i>zobenbrā</i><par n="po/lis__n_m"/></e>
